Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-632
Community Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Community Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash Fund is created. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the fund shall be within the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice, shall be administered by the division, and shall only be used to support operations costs and analysis relating to the implementation and coordination of the uniform analysis of crime data pursuant to the Community Corrections Act, including associated information technology projects. The fund shall consist of money collected pursuant to section 47-633.

(2) Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

(3) Any money in the Community Corrections Uniform Data Analysis Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 44;

Laws 2005, LB 426, § 11;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB322, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB63, § 31;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 23;

Laws 2011, LB378, § 21;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 13;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 23;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 138.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.